Mississippi statutes. Title 85. Debtor-Creditor Relationship
Article 3. Sale of Timepiece, Jewelry, etc. For Repair Charges.

§ 85-7-71.
Definition.

As used in Sections 85-7-71 through 85-7-81, the term “person” shall mean a natural person, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 352.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 377, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1964).

§ 85-7-73.
Sale of watches, jewelry, etc., left over 90 days for repairs, etc. permitted.

Any watch, clock, timepiece, ring, jewelry, or other item, which has been repaired, altered, cleaned, sized, rebuilt, adjusted, or regulated, remaining in the possession of a person for a period of ninety (90) days or more, may be sold to pay reasonable or agreed charges, together with any costs or expenses provided for in Sections 85-7-71 through 85-7-81. Provided, however, that the person to whom such charges are payable and owing shall first notify the owner or owners of the proposed sale of the articles belonging to them and the amount of the charges due thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 352.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 377, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1964).

§ 85-7-75.
Notice to owners.

The mailing by registered or certified United States mail of a letter, with a return address marked thereon, addressed to the owner or owners at their address given at the time of delivery of such articles to the person, shall constitute notice under the provisions of Sections 85-7-71 through 85-7-81. Said notice shall be mailed at least thirty (30) days before the articles belonging to such owner or owners may be sold for charges due thereon. The cost of mailing said letter shall be added to the charges.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 352.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 377, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1964).

§ 85-7-77.
Sale; disposition of proceeds.

If the chattel or chattels are not redeemed within thirty (30) days after the mailing of such letter, the person may sell such articles on the day and at the time and place specified in such letter. Such sales may be made either at public auction or by private sale. The proceeds of the sale in excess of the charges and necessary expenses of the procedure required by Sections 85-7-71 through 85-7-81 shall be held by the person for a period of six (6) months and if not reclaimed by the owner thereof within that time shall escheat to the county and be paid over to the chancery clerk to be placed into the general fund of the county in which the sale was held.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 352.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 377, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1964).

§ 85-7-79.
Notices required to be posted.

All persons taking advantage of Sections 85-7-71 through 85-7-81 must keep posted at all times in a prominent place in their receiving office or offices two (2) notices which read as follows: “All watches, clocks, timepieces, rings, jewelry, or other items, which have been repaired, altered, cleaned, sized, rebuilt, adjusted, or regulated, and not called for in ninety (90) days, will be sold to pay charges.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 352.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 377, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1964).

§ 85-7-81.
Purpose and intent of Sections 85-7-71 through 85-7-81.

The purpose and intent of Sections 85-7-71 through 85-7-81 is to provide an inexpensive means of enforcing liens for small amounts, and to that end the provisions of said sections shall be construed to create a lien in addition to, and shall not exclude, any liens which may exist by virtue of either the common law or any other statute of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 352.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 377, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1964).